Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1701
Warrant and arrest on indictment or presentment.

A warrant may be issued in term time or in vacation of the court, on an indictment found or presentment made in any county, and when directed to the sheriff of the county where such indictment was found, or presentment made, it shall be lawful for such officer to pursue and arrest the accused named in such warrant, in any county of this state where he may be found, and commit him to jail, or hold him to bail, as provided in this code.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 426, p. 819;

R.S.1913, § 9070;

C.S.1922, § 10094;

C.S.1929, § 29-1701;

R.S.1943, § 29-1701.